Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.16
Commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance; rules and regulations; violation; notice; hearing; certification to county attorney or Attorney General.

If it shall appear from the examination of any commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance that any of the provisions of the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act or the rules and regulations issued thereunder have been violated, the director shall cause notice of the violations to be given to the person from whom the sample was taken. Any person so notified shall be given opportunity to be heard under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the director. If it appears after such hearing, either in the presence or absence of the person so notified, that any of the provisions of the act or rules and regulations issued thereunder have been violated, the director may certify the facts to the county attorney of the county in which the violation occurred or to the Attorney General, as the case may be.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 16, p. 1045;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 17;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 35;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 24.
March 17, 2026